Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-185
Standards; primary and secondary.

Standards that are traceable to the United States prototype standards supplied by the federal government or approved as being satisfactory by the National Institute of Standards and Technology shall be the primary standards of measurement and shall be maintained so that they are traceable to the National Institute of Standards and Technology. All secondary standards may be prescribed by the director and shall be verified upon their initial receipt and as often thereafter as deemed necessary by the director.

Laws 1972, LB 1413, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 161, § 2.